Idaho, session 2025, H0390.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Employee Retirement System the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. RETIREMENT ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
PERSI Administrative
Fund $3,000,000 $615,600 $3,615,600
II. PORTFOLIO INVESTMENT:
FROM:
PERSI Special
Fund $12,500 $12,900 $25,400
GRAND TOTAL $3,012,500 $628,500 $3,641,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.